Utah statutes.
23-16-3.1.   Crop owner authorized to kill animals.
(1) (a)  A landowner or lessee may kill big game animals damaging those
cultivated crops on private land if:
(i)  it is necessary to protect cultivated crops;
(ii)  72 hours has expired since notice was given pursuant to Subsection
23-16-3(1)(a);
(iii)  the landowner or lessee has provided or sent written notice of an
intent to kill the big game animal to the nearest regional office;
(iv)  the landowner or lessee kills the big game animal within 90 days, or a
longer period, if approved, in writing, by the division, after having
requested that the division take action to prevent depredation under
Subsection 23-16-3(1)(a); and
(v)  the killing is not prohibited by Subsection (2)(a) or (3).
(b)  Immediately after killing a big game animal under Subsection (1)(a), the
landowner or lessee shall notify the division of the killing.
(c)  The carcass of an animal killed under Subsection (1)(a) shall become the
property of the division and shall be disposed of by the division.
(d)  Any money derived from the sale of animals killed shall be placed in the
Wildlife Resources Account created in Section 23-14-13.
(2) (a)  The division director may prohibit the killing of big game animals
under Subsection (1)(a) if, within 72 hours after a landowner or lessee has
requested that the division take action to remove depredating animals, the
division:
(i)  determines that the restitution value of the big game animal or animals,
as established under Section 23-20-4.5, is more than twice the estimated value
of the cultivated crops that have been or will be damaged or consumed;
(ii)  determines that the prohibition is consistent with the management plan
established under Section 23-16-7;
(iii)  notifies the landowner or lessee of the prohibition; and
(iv)  offers the landowner or lessee a depredation mitigation plan.
(b)  A landowner or lessee who is offered a depredation mitigation plan may:
(i)  accept the plan in writing; or
(ii)  refuse to accept the plan and appeal the plan, in writing, to the
division director.
(3)  After a landowner or lessee has killed a big game animal under Subsection
(1)(a), the division director may prohibit any further killing of big game
animals if:
(a)  the division takes the actions described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through
(iv); and
(b)  the mitigation review panel reviews and approves the depredation
mitigation plan.
